pl: Strefy temperaturowe: Dwie strefy; Wielostrefowe; Jedna strefa; Trzy strefy; Inne
de: Temperaturzonen: Doppelzone; Multi-Zone; Einzelzone; Dreifachzone; Sonstiges
vi: Các vùng nhiệt độ: Hai vùng; Đa vùng; Một vùng; Ba vùng; Khác
it: Zone di temperatura: Doppia zona; Multi-zone; Zona singola; Tripla zona; Altro
pt-BR: Zonas de temperatura: Zona dupla; Multi-zona; Zona única; Zona tripla; Outro
hr-HR: Temperaturne zone: Dvostruka zona; Višezonski; Jednostruka zona; Trostruka zona; Ostalo
sv: Temperaturzoner: Dubbelzon; Flerzoner; Enkel zon; Trippelzon; Annat
da: Temperaturzoner: Dobbeltzone; Multi-zone; Enkelt zone; Tredobbelt zone; Andet
nb: Temperatursoner: Dobbelsone; Flersone; Enkelt sone; Trippel sone; Annet
sl-SI: Temperaturna območja: Dvojna cona; Večpredstavnostni; Eno območje; Trojna cona; Druga
sk-SK: Teplotné pásma: Dvojzónová; Viac-zónové; Jednozónová; Trojzónová; Iné
zh-TW: 溫度區: 雙區; 多區; 單區; 三區; 其他
lt-LT: Temperatūros zonos: Dviejų zonų; Daugiazonis; Viena zona; Triguba zona; Kita
ru: Температурные зоны: Двухзонный; Многозонный; Однозонный; Трехзонный; Другое
nl: Temperatuurzones: Dubbele zone; Multi-zone; Enkele zone; Drievoudige zone; Overig
ja: 温度ゾーン: デュアルゾーン; マルチゾーン; シングルゾーン; トリプルゾーン; その他
zh-CN: 温度区: 双温区; 多温区; 单温区; 三温区; 其他
el: Ζώνες θερμοκρασίας: Διπλή ζώνη; Πολυζωνικό; Μονή ζώνη; Τριπλή ζώνη; Άλλο
bg-BG: Температурни зони: Двойна зона; Многозоново; Единична зона; Тройна зона; Друго
fr: Zones de température: Zone double; Multizone; Zone unique; Zone triple; Autre
ro-RO: Zone de temperatură: Zonă dublă; Zone multiple; Zonă simplă; Zonă triplă; Altele
tr: Sıcaklık bölgeleri: Çift bölgeli; Çok bölgeli; Tek bölgeli; Üç bölgeli; Diğer
es: Temperature zones: Zona dual; Multizona; Zona única; Triple zona; Otros
en: Temperature zones: Dual zone; Multi zone; Single zone; Triple zone; Other
pt-PT: Zonas de temperatura: Zona dupla; Multizona; Zona única; Zona tripla; Outro
cs: Teplotní zóny: Dvě zóny; Více zón; Jedna zóna; Tři zóny; Jiné
ko: 온도 구역 수: 이중 영역; 다중 영역; 단일 영역; 삼중 영역; 기타
th: โซนอุณหภูมิ: สองโซน; หลายโซน; โซนเดียว; สามโซน; อื่นๆ
hu: Hőmérsékleti zónák: Kettős zóna; Többzónás; Egyetlen zóna; Hármas zóna; Egyéb
fi: Lämpötila-alueet: Kaksi vyöhykettä; Monivyöhykkeinen; Yksi vyöhyke; Kolme vyöhykettä; Muu